Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8155.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 12-25-21.1 of the General Laws in Chapter 12-25 entitled "Criminal
Injuries Compensation" is hereby amended to read as follows:
12-25-21.1. Emergency fund for victims.
(a) The office may award emergency compensation under this chapter for the: (1) Burial
expenses of a victim who dies as a direct result of a violent crime as defined in this chapter; (2)
Cost of the crime scene clean up; (3) Relocation expenses; and (4) Compensation for modifications
to a victim’s residence necessary to ensure safety.
(b) The award for emergency compensation shall be awarded at the sole discretion of the
program administrator. The administrator may promulgate rules and regulations to administer the
provisions of this section.
(c) An award for emergency compensation for burial expenses shall not exceed the sum of
ten thousand dollars ($10,000).
(d) An award for emergency compensation for crime scene clean up shall not exceed two
thousand dollars ($2,000).
(e) An award for emergency compensation for relocation costs shall not exceed five
thousand dollars ($5,000) eight thousand dollars ($8,000).
(f) An award for expenses associated with reasonable modifications to the victim’s
residence necessary to ensure victim safety shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) and shall
not be awarded in addition to an award for emergency compensation for relocation costs. Further,

any ongoing costs or expenses associated with maintaining or monitoring any modification made
pursuant to this subsection shall be borne exclusively by the victim.
(g) The award for emergency compensation for burial expenses, crime scene clean up, and
relocation costs shall be deducted from the final award. In the event the victim is not eligible for an
award, the victim shall repay the amount of the emergency award to the fund.
(h) Any payments made for the emergency compensation shall be deducted from the final
award. In no event shall the final award exceed the maximum award of twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000).
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004642
========
LC004642 - Page 2 of 3